apertium-srd.srd.dix
<pardef n="pro/et__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>iat</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iant</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>eit</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eint</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erent</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>at</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ant</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="tz/c">
  <e>       <p><l>tz</l>        <r>tz</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>c</l>         <r>tz</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="tz/z">
  <e>       <p><l>tz</l>        <r>tz</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>z</l>         <r>tz</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="cun/con">
  <e>       <p><l>cun</l>       <r>cun</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>con</l>       <r>cun</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="cum/com">
  <e>       <p><l>cum</l>       <r>cum</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>com</l>       <r>cum</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="gn/nn">
  <e>       <p><l>gn</l>        <r>gn</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nn</l>        <r>gn</r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/t">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>d</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="e/i">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>e</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="à/a">
  <e>       <p><l>à</l>         <r>à</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>à</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>á</l>         <r>à</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="è/e">
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>è</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>è</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>è</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="ì/i">
  <e>       <p><l>ì</l>         <r>ì</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ì</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>è</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="ò/o">
  <e>       <p><l>ò</l>         <r>ò</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l>         <r>ò</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ó</l>         <r>ò</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="ù/u">
  <e>       <p><l>ù</l>         <r>ù</r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l>         <r>ù</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ú</l>         <r>ù</r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="èstone">          <i></i><par n="è/e"/><i>ston</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bòrtidu">         <i>b</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>rtid</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cràdiu">          <i>cr</i><par n="à/a"/><i>di</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de chimbantatrès"><i>de<b/>chimbantatr</i><par n="è/e"/><i>s</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de duamìgia">     <i>de<b/>duam</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>gia</i><par n="de_dos__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gradèssidu">      <i>grad</i><par n="è/e"/><i>ssid</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cungregadu">      <par n="cun/con"/><i>gregad</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tzibernèticu">    <par n="tz/c"/><i>ibern</i><par n="è/e"/><i>ti</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="immòbile">        <i>imm</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>bil</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tzirarbu">        <par n="tz/c"/><i>irarb</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lùghidu">         <i>l</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>ghid</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mìscrinu">        <i>m</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>scrin</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="millionàriu">     <i>million</i><par n="à/a"/><i>ri</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="monosèmicu">      <i>monos</i><par n="è/e"/><i>mi</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cumpartzìbile">   <par n="cum/com"/><i>partzìbil</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="perricònculu">    <i>perric</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>ncul</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pluritzellulare"> <i>pluri</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ellular</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cumportamentale"> <par n="cum/com"/><i>portamental</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cuntentadu">      <par n="cun/con"/><i>tentad</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="traìghidu">       <i>tra</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>ghid</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cunventzionale">  <par n="cun/con"/><i>ven</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ional</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="àidu">            <i></i><par n="à/a"/><i>id</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="ùrulu">           <i></i><par n="ù/u"/><i>rul</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="èlighe">          <i></i><par n="è/e"/><i>lighe</i><par n="pane__n"/></e>
<e lm="acumprimentu">    <i>a</i><par n="cum/com"/><i>priment</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="acòrdiu">         <i>ac</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>rdi</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="aglutinatzione">  <i>aglutina</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="cumbentu">        <par n="cum/com"/><i>bent</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="còtimu">          <i>c</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>tim</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="campionàrgiu">    <i>campion</i><par n="à/a"/><i>rgi</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="canalizatzione">  <i>canaliza</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="carbùnculu">      <i>carb</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>ncul</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="carrìngiu">       <i>carr</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>ngi</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="corcadòrgiu">     <i>corcad</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>rgi</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="cuotatzione">     <i>cuota</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="dèdica">          <i>d</i><par n="è/e"/><i>dica</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="decumpositzione"> <i>de</i><par n="cum/com"/><i>posi</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="dillìriu">        <i>dill</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>ri</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="cundimentu">      <par n="cun/con"/><i>diment</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="dispositzione">   <i>disposi</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="divàriu">         <i>div</i><par n="à/a"/><i>ri</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzeghedade">      <par n="tz/c"/><i>eghedad</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzeracatzu">      <par n="tz/c"/><i>eracatz</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="estremuntzione">  <i>estremun</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="farfarùgia">      <i>farfar</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>gia</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="cunfidu">         <par n="cun/con"/><i>fid</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="cungiadura">      <par n="cun/con"/><i>giadura</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="goddetòrgiu">     <i>goddet</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>rgi</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="gramìngiu">       <i>gram</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>ngi</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="tziclu">          <par n="tz/c"/><i>icl</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="illùdidu">        <i>ill</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>did</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzimiga">         <par n="tz/c"/><i>imiga</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="invocatzione">    <i>invoca</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzipu">           <par n="tz/c"/><i>ip</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="iscadentziàriu">  <i>iscadentzi</i><par n="à/a"/><i>ri</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzitu">           <par n="tz/c"/><i>it</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="mùsica">          <i>m</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>si</i><par n="linguìsti/ca__n"/></e>
<e lm="mèrcuris">        <i>m</i><par n="è/e"/><i>rcuris</i><par n="lapis__n"/></e>
<e lm="mìriu">           <i>m</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>ri</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="magistradura">    <i>magistra</i><par n="d/t"/><i>ura</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="microbiòlogu">    <i>microbi</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>log</i><par n="amig/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="mugronàgia">      <i>mugron</i><par n="à/a"/><i>gia</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzìnema">         <par n="tz/c"/><par n="ì/i"/><i>nema</i><par n="pane__n"/></e>
<e lm="ogrulùtzidu">     <i>ogrul</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>tzid</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="oratzione">       <i>ora</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="pìtzighe">        <i>p</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>tzighe</i><par n="pane__n"/></e>
<e lm="cumpangiedda">    <par n="cum/com"/><i>pangiedda</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="cumpatesa">       <par n="cum/com"/><i>patesa</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="cumplimentu">     <par n="cum/com"/><i>pliment</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="prunapèssighe">   <i>prunap</i><par n="è/e"/><i>ssighe</i><par n="pane__n"/></e>
<e lm="cumpànigu">       <par n="cum/com"/><i>pànig</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="rantzigùmene">    <i>rantzig</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>mene</i><par n="pane__n"/></e>
<e lm="restàuru">        <i>rest</i><par n="à/a"/><i>ur</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="resurretzione">   <i>resurre</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="semiòlogu">       <i>semi</i><par n="ò/o"/><i>log</i><par n="amig/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="cunservante">     <par n="cun/con"/><i>servante</i><par n="pane__n"/></e>
<e lm="testùine">        <i>test</i><par n="ù/u"/><i>ine</i><par n="pane__n"/></e>
<e lm="cuntestadura">    <par n="cun/con"/><i>testadura</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzàscula">        <i>tz</i><par n="à/a"/><i>scula</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzèbbia">         <i>tz</i><par n="è/e"/><i>bbia</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="tzìpria">         <i>tz</i><par n="ì/i"/><i>pria</i><par n="mesa__n"/></e>
<e lm="cunvertimentu">   <par n="cun/con"/><i>vertiment</i><par n="mac/u__n"/></e>
<e lm="violatzione">     <i>viola</i><par n="tz/z"/><i>ion</i><par n="region/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="acaèssere">       <p><l>acaess</l>    <r>acaèssere</r></p><par n="pro/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arbèscere">       <p><l>arbesc</l>    <r>arbèscere</r></p><par n="pro/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="arbèschere">      <p><l>arbesch</l>   <r>arbèschere</r></p><par n="pro/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dessignare">      <i>dessi</i><par n="gn/nn"/><i></i><par n="cant/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cungiolvare">     <par n="cun/con"/><i>giolv</i><par n="cant/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="insegnare">       <i>ins</i><par n="e/i"/><i>gn</i><par n="cant/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tzintzirrolare">  <par n="tz/c"/><i>intzirrol</i><par n="cant/are__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pròere">          <p><l>pro</l>       <r>pròere</r></p><par n="pro/et__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sutzèdere">       <p><l>sutzed</l>    <r>sutzèdere</r></p><par n="pro/et__vblex"/></e>
